Utah statutes.
41-1a-1303.5.   Driving without registration or certificate of title -- Class B misdemeanor.

(1) (a)  A violation of Subsection 41-1a-202(3), related to registration of vehicles after establishing residency, is a class B misdemeanor and, except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), has a minimum fine of $1,000.

(b)  A court may not dismiss an action brought for a violation of Subsection 41-1a-202(3) merely because the defendant has obtained the appropriate registration subsequent to violating the section.  The court may, however, reduce the fine to $200 if the violator presents evidence at the time of the hearing that:

(i)  the vehicle is currently registered properly; and

(ii)  the violation has not existed for more than one year.

(2)  A court may require proof of proper motor vehicle registration as part of any sentence imposed under this section.



Enacted by Chapter 245, 2013 General Session

